Tennessee, session 114, HB0885.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 8-44-110, is amended by deleting the
language "state governing body or a local government legislative body" wherever it may appear
and substituting "governing body", and is further amended by deleting the language "may" in
subsection (d) and substituting "shall", and is further amended by deleting subsection (e).
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0885
000782
- 1 -